Arkansas, session 2025, SB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-103 is amended to read as follows:
25-19-103. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Background and nondecisional information” means information
that is not deliberation;
(1)(A)(2)(A) “Custodian”, except as otherwise provided by law
and with respect to any public record, means the person having administrative
control of that record.
(B) “Custodian” does not mean a person who holds public
records solely for the purposes of storage, safekeeping, or data processing
for others;
(3) "Cybersecurity" means the measures taken to achieve
*LGL072*
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
protection against the criminal or unauthorized use of electronic data;
(4) “Deliberation” means an exchange of information or opinion
between two (2) or more members of a governing body that:
(A) Seeks, discloses, or inquires about a decision by a
member of the governing body concerning any matter on which official action
will foreseeably be taken by the governing body; or
(B) Solicits, discloses, or inquires about the support or
opposition of a member of the governing body concerning any matter on which
official action will foreseeably be taken by the governing body;
(2)(5) “Disaster recovery system” means an electronic data
storage system implemented and maintained solely for the purpose of allowing
a governmental unit or agency to recover operational systems and datasets
following the occurrence of a catastrophe, including without limitation an
act of war, an equipment failure, a cyberattack, or a natural disaster such
as a tornado, earthquake, or fire;
(3)(6) “Format” means the organization, arrangement, and form of
electronic information for use, viewing, or storage;
(7) “Governing body” means the governing body of a public
entity;
(8) “Informal meeting” means the gathering of two (2) or more
members of a governing body outside of a public meeting;
(4)(9) “Medium” means the physical form or material on which
records and information may be stored or represented and may include, but is
not limited to, paper, microfilm, microform, computer disks and diskettes,
optical disks, and magnetic tapes;
(5)(A)(10)(A) “Municipally owned utility system” means a utility
system owned or operated by a municipality that provides:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Water;
(iii) Wastewater;
(iv) Cable television; or
(v) Broadband service.
(B) “Municipally owned utility system” includes without
limitation a:
(i) Consolidated waterworks system under the
Consolidated Waterworks Authorization Act, § 25-20-301 et seq.;
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
(ii) Utility system managed or operated by a
nonprofit corporation under § 14-199-701 et seq.; and
(iii) Utility system owned or operated by a
municipality or by a consolidated utility district under the General
Consolidated Public Utility System Improvement District Law, § 14-217-101 et
seq.;
(11) “Poll” means a series of communications:
(A) Between:
(i) One (1) or more persons paid by a public entity
or agents or employees of that public entity; and
(ii) One (1) or more members of the governing body
of that public entity;
(B) Concerning any matter on which official action will
foreseeably be taken by the governing body;
(C) To determine:
(i) How the member of the governing body intends to
vote; or
(ii) Whether the member of the governing body
supports or opposes certain proposed action by the governing body; and
(D) For the purpose of exercising a responsibility,
authority, power, or duty of the governing body;
(6)(12) "Public meetings" "Public entity" means the meetings of
any:
(A) A bureau, commission, or agency of the state; or any
(B) A political subdivision of the state, including
municipalities, and counties, and boards of education,; and all
(C) All other boards, bureaus, commissions, or
organizations in the State of Arkansas, except grand juries, supported wholly
or in part by public funds or expending public funds;
(13)(A) “Public meeting” means the formal gathering together, in
a special or regular gathering, of a governing body, whether in person or
remotely.
(B) "Public meeting" does not include:
(i) The gathering together, whether in person or
remotely, of the members of a governing body to discuss the settlement of a
cause of action in a court-ordered alternative dispute resolution process,
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
including without limitation a settlement conference or mediation; and
(ii) A meeting of the Child Maltreatment
Investigations Oversight Committee under § 10-3-3201 et seq.;
(7)(A)(14)(A) “Public records” means writings, recorded sounds,
films, tapes, electronic or computer-based information, or data compilations
in any medium required by law to be kept or otherwise kept and that
constitute a record of the performance or lack of performance of official
functions that are or should be carried out by a public official or employee,
a governmental agency, or any other agency or improvement district that is
wholly or partially supported by public funds or expending public funds. All
records maintained in public offices or by public employees within the scope
of their employment shall be presumed to be public records.
(B) “Public records” does not mean software acquired by
purchase, lease, or license;
(8)(15) “Public water system” means all facilities composing a
system for the collection, treatment, and delivery of drinking water to the
general public, including without limitation reservoirs, pipelines,
reclamation facilities, processing facilities, distribution facilities, and
regional water distribution districts under The Regional Water Distribution
District Act, § 14-116-101 et seq.; and
(16) "Remotely" means through electronic means, including
without limitation by telephone, video conference, or video broadcast; and
(9)(17) “Vulnerability assessment” means an assessment of the
vulnerability of a public water system to a terrorist attack or other
intentional acts intended to substantially disrupt the ability of the public
water system to provide a safe and reliable supply of drinking water as
required by the Public Health Security and Bioterrorism Preparedness and
Response Act of 2002, Pub. L. No. 107-188.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 25-19-106 is amended to read as follows:
25-19-106. Open public Public meetings — Requirements, exceptions, and
penalties.
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all meetings,
formal or informal, special or regular, of the governing bodies of all
municipalities, counties, townships, and school districts and all boards,
bureaus, commissions, or organizations of the State of Arkansas, except grand
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
juries, supported wholly or in part by public funds or expending public
funds, shall be public meetings. To lawfully hold a public meeting, a
governing body shall ensure that:
(1) Prior notice of the public meeting has been provided as
required under subsection (b) of this section;
(2) Any executive session held within a public meeting is
conducted as required under subsection (c) of this section;
(3) The public meeting is recorded as provided under subsection
(d) of this section;
(4) The public is permitted reasonable access to the public
meeting, and members of the governing body attend the public meeting in the
appropriate manner, as provided under subsection (e) of this section; and
(5) The public meeting is conducted in a manner that allows the
public to attend and hear all of the governing body's meaningful discussion
and deliberation, if any, on official business as provided under subsections
(f) and (g) of this section.
(b)(1)(A) The time and place of each regular public meeting shall be
furnished to anyone who requests the information.
(B) Unless another notification timeline for the public
meeting of a governing body is specified by law, the notification required
under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be made at least three (3)
days before the public meeting takes place in order that the public may have
representatives at the public meeting.
(2)(A) In the event of an emergency or special meetings public
meeting, the person calling the public meeting shall notify the
representatives of the newspapers, radio stations, and television stations,
if any, located in the county in which the public meeting is to be held and
any news media located elsewhere that cover regular public meetings of the
governing body and that have requested to be so notified of emergency or
special public meetings of the time, place, and date of the public meeting.
(B) Notification The notification required under
subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall be made at least two (2) hours
before the public meeting takes place in order that the public shall may have
representatives at the public meeting.
(3) In addition to the requirements under subdivisions (b)(1)
and (2) of this section:
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
(A) The time, place, and date of a public meeting shall be
published online if the governing body or the public entity it governs
maintains a website or social media page; and
(B)(i) The governing body shall furnish the most current
agenda for a public meeting upon request and shall publish the most current
agenda for a public meeting online if the governing body or the public entity
it governs maintains a website or social media page at least three (3) days
before a regular public meeting and at least two (2) hours before an
emergency or special public meeting.
(ii) The requirement of subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i) of
this section does not preclude a governing body from adding items to an
agenda after the agenda has been furnished or posted under subdivision
(b)(3)(B)(i) of this section.
(c)(1)(A) Except as provided under subdivision (c)(6) of this section,
an An executive session will shall be permitted only for the purpose of:
(A)(i) considering Considering the employment,
appointment, promotion, demotion, disciplining, or resignation of any public
officer or employee.
(B)(ii) The specific purpose of the executive
session shall be announced in public before Before going into an executive
session called under subdivision (c)(1)(A)(i) of this section, a governing
body shall state publicly which specific purpose listed in subdivision
(c)(1)(A)(i) of this section is the basis for the executive session.
(2)(A)(iii) Only the person holding the top
administrative position in the public agency, department, or office involved,
the immediate supervisor of the employee involved, and the employee may be
present at the executive session when so requested by the governing body,
board, commission, or other public body holding the executive session.
(B)(iv) Any person being interviewed for the top
administrative position in the public agency, department, or office involved
may be present at the executive session when so requested by the governing
board, commission, or other public body holding the executive session.;
(B) Discussing how a governing body will respond to an
attack on or other breach of the cybersecurity of the public entity governed
by the governing body;
(C)(i) A board or commission of the state preparing
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
examination materials and answers to examination materials that are
administered to applicants for licensure from a state agency.
(ii) Boards and commissions are excluded from this
chapter for the administering of examinations to applicants for licensure;
and
(D) A governing body considering, evaluating, or discussing
matters pertaining to a public water system's security or municipally owned
utility system's security as described in § 25-19-105(b)(17).
(3)(2) Executive sessions must never shall not be called for the
purpose of defeating the reason or the spirit of this chapter.
(4) No resolution, ordinance, rule, contract, regulation, or
motion considered or arrived at in executive session will be legal unless,
following the executive session, the public body reconvenes in public session
and presents and votes on the resolution, ordinance, rule, contract,
regulation, or motion.
(5)(A) Boards and commissions of this state may meet in
executive session for purposes of preparing examination materials and answers
to examination materials that are administered to applicants for licensure
from state agencies.
(B) Boards and commissions are excluded from this chapter
for the administering of examinations to applicants for licensure.
(6) Subject to the provisions of subdivision (c)(4) of this
section, a public agency may meet in executive session for the purpose of
considering, evaluating, or discussing matters pertaining to public water
system security or municipally owned utility system security as described in
§ 25-19-105(b)(17).
(7) An executive session held by the Child Maltreatment
Investigations Oversight Committee under § 10-3-3201 et seq. is exempt from
this section.
(d)(1) All officially scheduled, special, and called open public
meetings Except as provided under subdivision (d)(5) of this section, a
public meeting shall be recorded in a manner that allows for the capture of
sound, including without limitation:
(A) A sound-only recording;
(B) A video recording with sound and picture; or
(C) A digital or analog broadcast capable of being
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
recorded.
(2) If a member of a governing body attends a public meeting
remotely, the remote portion of the public meeting that is recorded under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be recorded in the format in which
it is conducted.
(3) A recording of an open a public meeting under subdivision
(d)(1) or subdivision (d)(2) of this section shall be maintained by a public
entity for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of the open public
meeting.
(3)(4) The recording shall be maintained in a format that may be
reproduced upon a request under this chapter.
(4)(5) Subdivisions Subdivision (d)(1) and (2) of this section
do does not apply to:
(A) Executive sessions; or
(B) Volunteer fire departments.
(5) Cities of the second class and incorporated towns are exempt
from subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section until July 1, 2020.
(e)(1) A governing body shall ensure that Arkansas residents have
reasonable access to attend a public meeting, including through remote means,
if such remote means are utilized by the governing body.
(2) If the Governor declares a disaster emergency under the
Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq., a public entity
may assemble, gather, meet, and conduct an open public meeting through
electronic means, including without limitation by:
(A) Telephone;
(B) Video conference; or
(C) Video broadcast. Except as provided under subdivisions
(e)(3)-(5) of this section, a member of a governing body shall be physically
present at a public meeting to be counted for purposes of establishing a
quorum or to vote.
(2)(3) If an open public meeting is held under subdivision
(e)(1) of this section: Other than governing bodies of municipalities,
counties, or public school districts, a governing body may adopt a policy
permitting members of the governing body to attend a public meeting remotely.
(A) The public may attend the open public meeting using
electronic means; and
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
(B) Notice of the method the public may attend the open
public meeting shall be published with the notice of the open public meeting.
(4) The ability of the governing body of a public school
district to conduct a public meeting remotely shall be governed by § 6-13-
619.
(3)(5) Physical presence of the public or of an individual
member of the public entity at the open public meeting is not required under
this subsection. If the Governor declares a disaster emergency under the
Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, § 12-75-101 et seq., a governing
body may conduct a public meeting remotely.
(4)(6) The open public meeting shall be recorded in the format
in which it is conducted, including without limitation:
(A) A sound-only recording;
(B) A video recording with sound and picture; or
(C) A digital or analog broadcast capable of being
recorded. For a member of a governing body who attends a meeting remotely to
be counted for a quorum or to vote, the method used to permit the member of
the governing body to attend remotely shall:
(A) Provide a method for the governing body to verify the
identity of the member of the governing body attending remotely;
(B) Allow other members of the governing body and members
of the public, whether physically present at the public meeting or attending
the public meeting remotely, at all times to:
(i) Hear the member of the governing body attending
remotely;
(ii) Observe or otherwise understand a vote of a
member of the governing body attending remotely; and
(iii) Know the identity of the member of the
governing body attending remotely when that member is speaking or voting; and
(C) Allow a member of the governing body attending
remotely to hear the other members of the governing body and any public
comment.
(5)(7) A public entity shall maintain the records of an open
public meeting held under this subsection for a minimum of one (1) year from
the date of the open public meeting. A member of a governing body who attends
a public meeting remotely shall not receive mileage or per diem for attending
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
the public meeting.
(8) If one (1) or more members of a governing body attends a
public meeting remotely:
(A) The governing body shall enable members of the public
to attend the public meeting by the same means that the members of the
governing body attending the public meeting remotely are attending the public
meeting; and
(B) Notice of the method the public may attend the public
meeting shall be published with the notice of the public meeting.
(f) A member of a governing body shall not participate in a
communication, whether oral, written, electronic, or otherwise, that:
(1)(A) He or she knows or reasonably should know is a poll.
(B)(i) It is not a violation of subdivision (f)(1)(A) of
this section if a secretary or administrative assistant of a governing body
communicates in writing with one (1) or more members of the governing body
for the purpose of conducting a ministerial act, including without limitation
scheduling a public meeting of the governing body or setting the agenda for a
public meeting of the governing body.
(ii) It is a violation of subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this
section if a secretary or administrative assistant of a governing body
communicates with one (1) or more members of the governing body to schedule a
public meeting of the governing body or set the agenda for a public meeting
of the governing body and the communication functionally conducts substantive
business of the governing body concerning any matter on which official action
would foreseeably be taken by the governing body.
(C)(i) It is not a violation of subdivision (f)(1)(A) of
this section if an employee or an agent of a public entity communicates
background and nondecisional information to one (1) or more members of the
governing body of the public entity.
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(1)(B)(i)
of this section, it is a violation of subdivision (f)(1)(A) of this section
if an employee or agent of a public entity communicates to a member of the
governing body of the public entity:
(a) How another member of the governing body
intends to vote; or
(b) Whether another member of the governing
03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072

As Engrossed: S2/20/25 S2/26/25 S3/3/25 S3/10/25 S3/12/25 H3/18/25 SB227
body supports or opposes a certain proposed action by the governing body; or
(2)(A) Occurs outside of a public meeting with another member of
the governing body about a matter on which official action will foreseeably
be taken by the governing body.
(B) It is not a violation of subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this
section if a member of a governing body communicates background and
nondecisional information to one (1) or more members of the same governing
body.
(C) It is a violation of subdivision (f)(2)(A) of this
section if a member of a governing body engages in any communication with one
(1) or more members of the same governing body that constitutes deliberation,
as deliberation may only occur at a public meeting of the governing body.
(g) An informal meeting that includes deliberation or that is for the
purpose of exercising a responsibility, authority, power, or duty of a
governing body is strictly prohibited.
(h) Two (2) or more employees or agents of a public entity may
communicate for the purpose of exercising an authorized responsibility,
authority, power, or duty of an employee or agent of the public entity
outside of a public meeting.
(i)(1) If a circuit court finds under § 25-19-107 that a governing
body is in violation of this section, the circuit court may invalidate any
action the governing body took at the unlawful public meeting.
(2) If a circuit court finds under § 25-19-107 that a member of
a governing body engaged in a communication prohibited under subsection (f)
of this section or in an informal meeting prohibited under subsection (g) of
this section, the circuit court may invalidate any action the governing body
took that is the direct or indirect result of the prohibited communication or
informal meeting.
(3) An action taken in an executive session is void unless the
governing body conducts a public vote on the matter discussed in the
executive session at the conclusion of the executive session.

/s/C. Tucker



03-18-2025 11:14:33 LGL072